Ohio, session 136, SB296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5163.33 of the Revised Code be 5
amended to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5163.33. (A) In determining the amount of income that 7
a medicaid recipient must apply monthly toward payment of the 8
cost of care in a nursing facility or ICF/IID, a county 9
department of job and family services shall deduct from the 10
recipient's monthly income a monthly personal needs allowance in 11
accordance with the "Social Security Act," section 1902(q), 42 12
U.S.C. 1396a(q). 13
(B) In the case of a resident of a nursing facility, the 14
monthly personal needs allowance shall be not less than fifty 15
dollars for an individual resident and not less than one hundred 16
dollars for a married couple if both spouses are residents of a 17
nursing facility and their incomes are considered available to 18
each other in determining eligibility. 19

S. B. No. 296 Page 2
As Introduced
(C) In the case of a resident of an ICF/IID, the monthly 20
personal needs allowance shall be as follows: 21
(1) Prior to January 1, 2016, forty dollars unless the 22
resident has earned income, in which case the monthly personal 23
needs allowance shall be determined by the department of 24
medicaid, or the department's designee, but shall not exceed one 25
hundred five dollars; 26
(2) For calendar year 2016 and each calendar year 27
thereafter, not less than fifty dollars for an individual 28
resident and not less than one hundred dollars for a married 29
couple if both spouses are residents of an ICF/IID and their 30
incomes are considered available to each other in determining 31
eligibility. 32
(D) It is the intent of the general assembly that 33
beginning on the effective date of this amendment, the medicaid 34
director shall increase the amounts specified in divisions (B) 35
and (C) of this section to not less than seventy-five dollars 36
for an individual resident and not less than one hundred fifty 37
dollars for a married couple. Thereafter, on the thirtieth day 38
of each September, the director shall increase those amounts 39
effective the following January first. The amount of the 40
increase shall be equal to the percentage increase, if any, in 41
the consumer price index from the average of the third quarter 42
of the year in which the calculation is being made to the 43
average of the third quarter of the previous year. The medicaid 44
director shall round the percentage increase to the nearest one- 45
tenth of one per cent. If no increase in that index occurs, the 46
medicaid director shall not increase the amount. 47
Section 2. That existing section 5163.33 of the Revised 48
Code is hereby repealed. 49